Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 5. Name.

§ 13.1-829.
Corporate name.

A corporate name shall not contain:

Any word or phrase that indicates or implies that it is organized for the purpose of conducting any business other than a business that it is authorized to conduct;

The word “redevelopment” unless the corporation is organized as an urban redevelopment corporation pursuant to Chapter 190 of the Acts of Assembly of 1946, as amended;

Any word, abbreviation, or combination of characters that states or implies the corporation is a limited liability company, a limited partnership, a registered limited liability partnership, or a protected series of a series limited liability company; or

Any word or phrase that is prohibited by law for such corporation.

Except as authorized by subsection C, a corporate name shall be distinguishable upon the records of the Commission from:

The name of any corporation, whether issuing shares or not issuing shares, existing under the laws of the Commonwealth or authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A corporate name reserved or registered under §

13.1-631

,

13.1-632

,

13.1-830

or

13.1-831

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign corporation, whether issuing shares or not issuing shares, because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of a domestic limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A limited liability company name reserved under §

13.1-1013

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign limited liability company because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of a domestic business trust or a foreign business trust registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A business trust name reserved under §

13.1-1215

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign business trust because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of a domestic limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A limited partnership name reserved under §

50-73.3

; and

The designated name adopted by a foreign limited partnership because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth.

A domestic corporation may apply to the Commission for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the Commission’s records from one or more of the names described in subsection B. The Commission shall authorize use of the name applied for if the other entity consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in form satisfactory to the Commission to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission from the name of the applying corporation.

The use of assumed names or fictitious names, as provided for in Chapter 5 (§ 59.1-69 et seq.) of Title 59.1, is not affected by this chapter.

The Commission, in determining whether a corporate name is distinguishable upon its records from the name of any of the business entities listed in subsection B, shall not consider any word, phrase, abbreviation, or designation required or permitted under §

13.1-544.1

, subsection A of §

13.1-630

, subsection A of §

13.1-1012

, §

13.1-1104

, subsection A of §

50-73.2

, and subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

to be contained in the name of a business entity formed or organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-207; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 232; 2003, c. 592; 2005, c. 379; 2007, c. 925; 2009, c. 216; 2012, c. 63; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to name for purposes of articles of domestication, see §

13.1-898.4

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 592, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only, (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act [October 1, 2004] with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership, and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

Acts 2012, c. 63, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the propriety of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 592, effective October 1, 2004, substituted “that” for “which” in subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “A corporate name reserved or registered under” for “A name, the exclusive right to which is, at the time, reserved or registered in the manner provided in”; and added subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 379, effective March 21, 2005, in subsection E, inserted “designation,” substituted “§

13.1-544.1

, subsection A of §

13.1-630

, subsection A of §

13.1-1012

, §

13.1-1104

, subdivision 1 of §

50-73.2

, and subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

” for “this chapter, Chapter 7 (§

13.1-542

et seq.), 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.), 13 (§

13.1-1100

et seq.), and 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of this title, and Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.) of Title 50,” and made a related change; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; substituted “A” for “The” at the beginning of subsection A; deleted “of this section” following “subsection C” in the introductory paragraph of subsection B; in subsection C, in the first sentence, substituted “the Commission’s” for “its” and deleted “of this section” at the end, deleted the subdivision C 1 designation and former subdivision C 2, which was repealed; and in subsection D, inserted “for” following “provided” and substituted “Act” for “chapter.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 216 divided former subsection A into the introductory language of subsection A and subdivision A 1; and in subsection A, deleted “any” at the end in the introductory language, added “Any” at the beginning of subdivision A 1, added subdivision A 2 and made a related change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 63 added subdivisions A 3 and A 4; substituted “subsection A” for “subdivision 1” in subsection E; and made a related change.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “Acts of Assembly of 1946” for “1946 Acts of Assembly” in subdivision A 2; inserted “a registered limited liability partnership, or a protected series of a series limited liability company” in subdivision A 3; substituted “chapter” for “Act” in subsection D; and made stylistic changes. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-830.
Reserved name.

A person may apply to the Commission to reserve the exclusive use of a corporate name, including a designated name for a foreign corporation. If the Commission finds that the corporate name applied for is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission, it shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a 120-day period.

The owner of a reserved corporate name may renew the reservation for successive periods of 120 days each by filing with the Commission, during the 45-day period preceding the date of expiration of the reservation, a renewal application.

The owner of a reserved corporate name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the Commission a notice of the transfer, signed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved, and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

A reserved corporate name may be used by its owner in connection with (i) the formation of, or an amendment to change the name of, a domestic stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; (ii) an application for a certificate of authority or registration to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; or (iii) an amended application for such authority or registration, provided that the proposed name complies with the provisions of §

13.1-630

,

13.1-762

,

13.1-829

,

13.1-924

,

13.1-1012

,

13.1-1054

,

13.1-1214

,

13.1-1244

,

50-73.2

, or

50-73.56

, as the case may be.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-207.1; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2006, c. 505; 2007, c. 925; 2015, c. 444; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 505 added the language beginning “by filing with” in subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925, in subsection A, substituted “A person” for “Any person or foreign or domestic corporation” in the first sentence and inserted “corporate” preceding “name applied” in the last sentence; and deleted “or corporation” following “person” in subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 444 in subsection A, deleted “whose corporate name is not available” at the end of the first sentence and substituted “distinguishable upon the records of the Commission” for “available” in the second sentence; substituted “signed” for “executed” in subsection C; added subsection D; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “the formation of” for “the formation” in subsection D. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-831.
Registered name.

A foreign corporation may register its corporate name, or its corporate name with any addition required by §

13.1-924

, if the name is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission.

A foreign corporation registers its corporate name, or its corporate name with any addition required by §

13.1-924

, by filing with the Commission (i) an application setting forth its corporate name, or its corporate name with any addition required by §

13.1-924

, the state or country and date of its incorporation, and a brief description of the nature of the business in which it is engaged and (ii) a certificate setting forth that such corporation is in good standing, or a document of similar import, from the state or country of incorporation, executed by the official who has custody of the records pertaining to corporations.

Except as provided in subsection F, registration is effective for one year after the date an application is filed.

If the Commission finds that the corporate name applied for is available, it shall register the name for the applicant’s exclusive use.

A foreign corporation whose registration is effective may renew it for the succeeding year by filing with the Commission, during the 60-day period preceding the date of expiration of the registration, a renewal application that complies with the requirements of subsection B. The renewal application is effective when filed in accordance with this section and, except as provided in subsection F, renews the registration for one year after the date the registration would have expired if such subsequent renewal of the registration had not occurred.

A foreign corporation whose registration is effective may thereafter obtain a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth under the registered name or consent in writing to the use of that name by a corporation thereafter incorporated under this chapter or by another foreign corporation thereafter authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. The registration terminates when the domestic corporation is incorporated or the foreign corporation obtains a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth or consents to the authorization of another foreign corporation to transact business in the Commonwealth under the registered name.

A foreign corporation that has in effect a registration of its corporate name may release such name by filing a notice of release of a registered name with the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-207.2; 1975, c. 500; 1981, c. 522; 1985, c. 522; 1995, c. 114; 2002, c. 607; 2007, c. 925; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 607 substituted “§

13.1-924

” for “§

13.1-919

” in subsections A and B and in subdivision B 1.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925, in subsection B, substituted “addition” for “additions” in the introductory paragraph, substituted “its corporate name” for “the name of the corporation” in clause (i) of subdivision B 1 and in subdivision B 2, inserted “in the amount” following “registration fee” in the first sentence and deleted “of this section” following “subsection E” in the last sentence; in subsection D, in the first sentence, substituted “that” for ‘’which” and “the requirements of subsection B, and” for “subsection B of this section, and by” and in the last sentence, substituted “is effective” for “becomes effective”; in subsection E, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” four times and in the first sentence, substituted “the registered name” for “that name” and “Act” for “chapter”; substituted “that” for ‘’which” in subsection F; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “from the corporate names that are not available under subsection B of §

13.1-829

” at the end of subsection A; in subsection B, deleted the subdivision B 1 designation and subdivision B 2, which read, “Paying to the Commission a registration fee in the amount of $20”; redesignated the former last paragraph of subsection B as subsection C and renumbered the remaining subsections accordingly; in subsections C and E, substituted “subsection F” for “subsection E”; in subsection E, deleted “and paying a renewal fee of $20” at the end of the first sentence; in subsection F, substituted “chapter” for “Act”; deleted “and by paying a fee of $10” at the end of subsection G; and made stylistic changes. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-832.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 771, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-832

, relating to property title records, was derived from Code 1950, § 13.1-289; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1996, c. 282.